New York, session 2025-2026, A7529.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Park rangers of the Erie county department of parks, recreation 4 and forestry and building security of the Erie county department of 5 homeland security and emergency services, who shall be authorized to 6 issue appearance tickets, simplified traffic informations, simplified 7 parks informations and simplified environmental conservation informa- 8 tions; provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision shall be 9 deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, repair or dispose of 10 a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor has been issued pursu- 11 ant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10450-01-5